Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-128
Medical history; access; contents.

A child placement agency shall maintain, and shall provide to the adopting parents upon placement of the person with such parents and to the adopted person upon his or her request, the available medical history of the person placed for adoption and of the biological parents. The medical history shall not include the names of the biological parents of the adopted person or the place of birth of the adopted person.

Laws 1980, LB 992, § 10;

Laws 1983, LB 146, § 4.